Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 1. State Sales Tax
§ 39-15-106.
Licenses; permits.

Every vendor shall obtain from the department a sales tax license to conduct business in the state. Any out-of-state vendor not otherwise subject to this article may voluntarily apply for a license from the department and if licensed, shall collect and remit the state sales tax imposed by W.S.

39-15-104

. The license shall be granted only upon application stating the name and address of the applicant, the character of the business in which the applicant proposes to engage, the location of the proposed business and other information as the department may require. Effective July 1, 1997, a license fee of sixty dollars ($60.00) shall be required from each new vendor, except for any remote vendor who has no requirement to register in this state, or who is using one (1) of the technology models pursuant to the streamlined sales and use tax agreement. Failure of a vendor to timely file any return may result in forfeiture of the license granted under this section. The department shall charge sixty dollars ($60.00) for reinstatement of any forfeited license. The department shall send any vendor who reports no gross sales for three (3) consecutive years a form prescribed by the department to show cause why the vendor’s license should not be revoked. The vendor shall complete and file the report with the department within thirty (30) days of receipt of the form. If the department finds just cause for the vendor to retain the license, no further action shall be taken. If the department finds just cause to revoke the license, the vendor shall be notified of the revocation. Any vendor whose license is revoked under this subsection may appeal the decision to the state board of equalization as provided in subsection (g) of this section.

A separate license is required for each place of business.

Each license shall be numbered and shall:

Contain the name and residence of the licensee;

Indicate the place and character of the business of the licensee;

Be posted in a conspicuous place at the place of business for which it is issued.

No license is transferable.

Licenses issued under this section are valid without further payment of fees until revoked by the department.

Any person discontinuing business shall notify the department, return his license for cancellation and preserve all business records in the state until the department issues a receipt showing all taxes have been paid.

The department may, after providing two (2) written notices of intent to revoke identifying the reasons therefore, revoke the license of any vendor violating any provision of this article. The notices shall be provided at least one (1) week apart and the final notice shall be provided at least thirty (30) days prior to any revocation. The revocation of the department shall inform the vendor of all steps necessary to conform with the revocation and shall include the consequences of failure to cease business activities and the opportunity to appeal as provided in this subsection. The vendor may appeal a revocation under this subsection to the state board of equalization not more than thirty (30) days following the revocation of the license. Appeals before the state board shall be conducted as contested case proceedings under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. If a license is revoked under this subsection, no license shall thereafter be issued to that person until the applicant has:

Filed a new application with the department;

Filed with the department all past due returns and has remitted in full all taxes, penalties and interest due.

The department may, after providing notice and an opportunity for a hearing, suspend the license of any vendor violating any provision of this article until the time the vendor is in compliance.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, and pursuant to department rules and regulations, a vendor who purchases wholesale goods for use in manufacturing, processing or compounding as provided by W.S. 39-15-105(a)(iii), and who does not engage in any retail sale of those goods, shall not be required to obtain a sales tax license.

The department may enter into an agreement with an entity which is not otherwise required to obtain a license under this article and which has one (1) or more independent sales contractors working in this state. Any entity licensed pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to the licensing provisions of this section and shall collect and remit the tax imposed under this article on all taxable sales transactions occurring between entities and the independent sales contractor. Any entity licensed under this subsection shall be subject to all collection and enforcement provisions imposed by this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 58, § 2; 2001, ch. 147, § 2; 2003, ch. 13, § 1; 2008, ch. 34, § 1; 2017 ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2008 amendment,

in (a), substituted “39-15-104” for “39-15-103” at the end of the second sentence, and substituted “or who is using one (1) of the technology models pursuant to the streamlined sales and use tax agreement” for “and who is using one (1) of the technology models pursuant to W.S.

39-15-401

, et seq” at the end of the fourth sentence.

Laws 2008, ch. 34, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2008.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), added “as provided in subsection (g) of this section” at the end; and rewrote (g), which formerly read: “The department may, after providing notice and an opportunity for a hearing, revoke the license of any vendor violating any provision of this article and no license shall thereafter be issued to that person until the applicant has.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

Applied

in

Buehner Block Co. v. Wyoming Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 90, 139 P.3d 1150,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(2006).

§ 39-15-107.
Compliance; collection procedures.

Returns, reports and preservation of records. The following shall apply:

Each vendor shall on or before the last day of each month file a true return showing the preceding month’s gross sales and remit all taxes to the department. The returns shall contain such information and be made in the manner as the department by regulation prescribes. The department may allow extensions for filing returns and paying the taxes by regulation, but no extension may be for more than ninety (90) days. If the total tax to be remitted by a vendor during any month is less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00), a quarterly or annual return as authorized by the department, and remittance in lieu of the monthly return may be made on or before the last day of the month following the end of the quarter or year for which the tax is collected. If the accounting methods regularly used by any vendor are such that reports of sales made during a calendar month would impose unnecessary hardships, the department after receiving a formal request filed by the vendor may accept reports at intervals as would be more convenient to the taxpayer. Any vendor shall report whether the vendor sells nicotine products, as defined by W.S. 39-18-101(a)(xi), in this state to the department in the form and manner required by the department. The department may reject any report required under this paragraph of any vendor who does not comply with the nicotine sales reporting requirements. Every person purchasing goods or services taxable by this article who does not pay the tax owed to a vendor shall, on or before the last day of each month, file a return showing the gross purchases made during the preceding month and remit all taxes due to the department. The return shall contain such information and be made in the manner as the department shall prescribe by rule and regulation. The department, by rule and regulation, may allow an extension for filing a return and paying any tax due, but no extension shall be granted for more than ninety (90) days;

Every vendor and person liable for the payment of sales tax under this article shall preserve for three (3) years at his principal place of business, suitable records and books as may be necessary to determine the amount of tax for which he is liable under this article, together with all invoices and books showing all merchandise purchased for resale. All records, books and invoices shall be available for examination by the department during regular business hours except as arranged by mutual consent;

If any vendor or person liable for the payment of sales tax under this article fails to comply with paragraph (ii) of this subsection, he shall bear the burden of proof as to the correctness of any assessment of taxes imposed by the department for the period for which records were not preserved in any court action or proceeding;

If a vendor fails to file a return as required by this article, the department shall give written notice by mail to the vendor to file a return on or before the last day of the month following the notice of delinquency. If a vendor then fails to file a return the department shall make a return from the best information available which will be prima facie correct and the tax due therein is a deficiency and subject to penalties and interest as provided by this article;

The department shall preserve returns and reports for three (3) years;

The vendor shall file a return within thirty (30) days after discontinuing or selling his business;

Taxes collected under paragraphs (b)(i) and (ii) of this section are due and payable and shall be remitted in full by the county treasurer to the department monthly or as required by the department together with reports as required by the department;

When applying for registration, every new owner of a motorcycle shall produce either:

A receipt from the department showing that the sales or use tax has been paid;

A receipt on forms provided by the department showing that the motorcycle was purchased from a Wyoming licensed dealer and that the dealer has collected the sales tax; or

A certificate from the department that no sales or use tax is due.

As soon as practicable after the return is filed the department shall examine it and if it appears from the information on the return the tax to be remitted is incorrect, the tax shall be recomputed. If the amount remitted exceeds that which is due from the recomputed return, the excess shall be refunded or credited as provided in W.S. 39-15-109(c) and (d);

Taxes paid on gross receipts represented by accounts found to be worthless may be credited against subsequent liability of the vendor. The vendor shall not take the credit for any bad debt until he has used the customary debt collection procedures as documented in writing by the vendor and has written off the debt; or until the debt qualifies as a bad debt under 26 U.S.C. section 166 excluding financing charges or interest, sales or use taxes charged on the purchase price, uncollectible amounts on property that remain in the possession of the seller until the full purchase price is paid, any expenses incurred in attempting to collect any debt, and repossessed property. If any account is thereafter collected by the vendor, a tax shall be paid upon the amount collected. The amount collected shall be applied proportionally first to the taxable price of the property or service and the sales tax thereon, and then to interest, service charges and any other charges. Should the bad debt exceed the taxable sales for a subsequent period the vendor may request a refund of the tax on the bad debt from the department so long as the claim is made within three (3) years of the date of the return on which the bad debt could first be claimed. A certified service provider under W.S.

39-15-401

through

39-15-408

acting on behalf of a vendor may claim the bad debt allowance for the vendor and shall remit the credit or refund received to the vendor. Should the bad debt apply to more than one (1) state, the debt may be allocated between the affected states.

Payment. The following shall apply:

Except as provided by paragraph (viii) of this subsection, no vendor shall collect taxes imposed by this article upon the sale of motor vehicles, house trailers, trailer coaches, trailers or semitrailers. The taxes imposed shall be collected by the county treasurer prior to the first registration in Wyoming and not upon subsequent registration by the same applicant. The county treasurer shall provide the applicant a receipt specifying the amount of sales tax collected and noting any valid exemption from sales tax. The county treasurer shall collect and remit to the department the tax in effect in the county of the owner’s principal residence;

Except for those vehicles specified under paragraph (viii) of this subsection, the tax imposed by this article upon the sale of a motor vehicle, house trailer, trailer coach, trailer or semitrailer purchased as a gift shall be collected from the donee prior to the first registration based upon the fair market value of the gift at the time of the gift;

Motor vehicle vendors and vendors of house trailers, trailer coaches, trailers or semitrailers shall not be required to pay sales taxes on motor vehicles, house trailers, trailer coaches, trailers or semitrailers if they are registered in the vendor’s name, are included as a part of the vendor’s inventory and are held principally in the conduct of the vendor’s business for sale, demonstration or delivery prior to sale and use, except a motor vehicle vendor shall be liable for payment of sales or use tax on the transfer of a motor vehicle with less than one thousand (1,000) miles on the odometer he purchases if:

The vendor is not a properly licensed dealer under W.S.

31-16-101

et seq.;

The vehicle he purchased was transferred with a manufacturer’s statement of origin or manufacturer’s certificate of origin from a properly licensed dealer; and

The vehicle was transferred into his inventory for sale, demonstration or delivery.

A person regularly engaged in the business of making loans or a supervised financial institution, as defined in W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xix), that forecloses a lien or repossesses a motor vehicle on which it has filed a lien, or an insurance company that acquires ownership of a motor vehicle pursuant to a damage settlement, shall not be liable for payment of sales or use tax, penalties or interest due under this section or W.S.

39-16-107

for that vehicle;

The taxes are due and payable on the last day of the month following the month in which they were collected or as required by the department as specified in this article;

If a sale is made on credit, contract or conditional basis and title does not pass until a future date, there shall be paid upon each payment that portion of the total tax which the amount paid bears to the purchase price. If a vendor discontinues business, the tax shall be computed and paid on the outstanding amount of all credit, installment and conditional sales;

If any vendor collects a tax in excess of that imposed by this article it shall be remitted to the department after making reasonable attempts to identify and refund the excess tax to the taxpayer that originally paid the tax;

Notwithstanding W.S. 39-15-107(b)(i), the tax imposed under this article upon the sale of mopeds and motorcycles as defined in W.S. 31-5-102(a) and off-road recreational vehicles defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv) shall be collected by the vendor in the manner prescribed by this section;

When the department has reason to believe the collection of any tax, penalty or interest will be jeopardized by delay it shall immediately levy a jeopardy assessment and the amount assessed shall be immediately due and payable. Notice of the assessment shall be given to the vendor personally or by mail. If the jeopardy assessment is not paid within ten (10) days after the service of notice upon the vendor, the deficiency penalty and interest provided in W.S. 39-15-108(c)(ii) shall attach to the amount of the jeopardy assessment;

The department may enter into contracts with collection agencies for required collection services on deficiencies of sales tax occurring under W.S.

39-15-101

through

39-15-111

. Any taxes recovered by the collection agencies and remitted to the department shall be distributed in accordance with W.S.

39-15-111

(b). Any person owing a tax submitted to a collection agency may be assessed a fee in an amount necessary to cover the cost of collection, not to exceed twenty percent (20%) of the tax owed, as provided in W.S. 9-1-415(a). The collection agency shall collect the fee with the tax that is submitted for collection and the amount collected as a fee may be deducted from funds remitted to the department. The contracts entered into under this paragraph shall not be for a term of more than two (2) years and shall be awarded only after competition;

If a vendor or direct payer pays taxes due and payable under this chapter on or before the fifteenth day of the month that the taxes are due under paragraph (v) of this subsection, a credit shall be allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter for expenses incurred by a vendor or direct payer for the accounting and reporting of taxes. For the first six thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($6,250.00) of tax due, the credit is equal to one and ninety-five hundredths percent (1.95%) of the amount of tax due. For any tax due in excess of six thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($6,250.00), the credit for that additional amount shall be one percent (1%) of that amount, provided that the total credit under this paragraph and W.S.

39-16-107

(b)(viii) shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) in any month. The vendor or direct payer shall deduct the credit for each tax period on forms prescribed and furnished by the department. The credit shall be deducted only from the share of the tax that is distributed to the general fund under W.S. 39-15-111(b)(i).

Timelines. Except as otherwise specifically provided, there are no general applicable provisions for timelines for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 54, § 1; ch. 58, § 2; 2000, ch. 82, § 1; 2001, ch. 72, § 2; ch. 124, § 1; 2003, ch. 204, § 1; 2005, ch. 5, § 2; 2006, ch. 10, § 1; 2011, ch. 183, § 1; 2016 ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment

in (a)(x), added the second exception in the second sentence, added the final four sentences, and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2005, ch. 5, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2005.

The 2006 amendment,

effective Jan. 1, 2008, amends this section effective Jan. 1, 2008, by substituting “the return on which the bad debt could first be claimed” for “sale” in the fifth sentence of (a)(x).

The 2011 amendment,

effective January 1, 2012, added (b)(xi).

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, rewrote former (a)(ix) which read: “As soon as practicable after the return is filed the department shall examine it and if it appears the tax to be remitted is incorrect it shall be recomputed. If the amount paid exceeds that which is due the excess shall be refunded to the vendor or person who submitted the return or credited against any subsequent liability of the vendor or person who submitted the return”; and added “after making reasonable attempts to identify and refund the excess tax to the taxpayer that originally paid the tax” at the end of (b)(vii).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, rewrote (b)(x).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(i) substituted “vendor sells nicotine products, as defined by W.S. 39-18-101(a)(xi)” for “vendor sells cigarettes, cigars, snuff or other tobacco products” and “nicotine sales” for “tobacco sales.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added the third sentence in (b)(i).

Statutory construction. —

Statutes which impose restrictions on trade or common occupations, or which levy an excise tax upon them, are generally construed strictly, but revenue laws will, if ambiguous or doubtful, be construed in favor of the taxpayer. State v. Capital Coal Co., 54 Wyo. 176, 88 P.2d 481,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1939).

Weight entitled to administrative interpretation. —

Where several sessions of the legislature had passed in which no attempt was made to amend this article after interpretation had been placed upon it by administrative officers, their interpretation was entitled to weight by the court in construing the article. Walgreen Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 62 Wyo. 288, 166 P.2d 960,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1946).

Test as to when sales tax is applied is transfer of title.

In re Sales Tax Assessment No. 50030, 522 P.2d 149,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1974).

Notice or hearing not required. —

No notice or hearing is necessary to make taxpayer liable for sales and use taxes since it is made taxpayer's duty to make return, accompanied by tax payment due. Morrison-Knudson Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 58 Wyo. 500, 135 P.2d 927,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1943).

This section does not constitute general limitation statute

so as to prevent the board of equalization (now department) from assessing an additional sales tax for sales during a period which is more than three years prior to date of assessment. Walgreen Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 62 Wyo. 288, 166 P.2d 960,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1946).

Refund based on best information available. —

Although a taxpayer did not timely produce evidence to support a sales tax refund claim and should not, under case law interpreting former Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 39-1-302, 39-1-304(a), have been allowed to supplement the record on administrative appeal, the mandatory language of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-15-109(c) entitled the taxpayer to a refund based under this section on the best information available. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue v. Qwest Corp., 2011 WY 146, 263 P.3d 622,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 2011).

Applied

in

Buehner Block Co. v. Wyoming Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 90, 139 P.3d 1150,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(2006).

Quoted

in

In re Sunrise Constr. Co., 32 B.R. 257, 1983 Bankr. LEXIS 5651 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1983); State Bd. of Equalization v. Jackson Hole Ski Corp., 737 P.2d 350,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 449

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

Rock Springs Ford Nissan v. State Bd. of Equalization, 890 P.2d 1100,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Separate Sales Tax Upon Vendors,” see 1 Wyo. L.J. 89.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Computation of sales tax where property is turned in by purchaser, 4 ALR2d 1059.

Federal retail luxury or other excise tax as includable in amount on which the state sales tax is computed, 43 ALR2d 862.

Sufficient nexus for state to require foreign entity to collect state's compensating, sales, or use tax — post-complete auto transit cases, 71 ALR5th 671.

§ 39-15-107.1.
Direct payment of sales tax; permit required; authorization; rules and regulations.

Upon application by any person liable for the payment of sales tax under this article or a licensed vendor, the director of the department of revenue, in his sole discretion, may issue to the applicant a permit to be known as a direct payment permit authorizing the applicant to make direct payment to the department of revenue of any sales tax imposed under this article. The decision of the director shall not be appealable. The direct payment permit shall be signed by an authorized representative of the department. Any direct payment permit issued under this section may be revoked by the department of revenue at any time upon ninety (90) days written notice to the permittee.

Any applicant issued a direct payment permit authorized by subsection (a) of this section shall pay any sales tax authorized by this article directly to the department of revenue. The applicant shall issue to each vendor furnishing or supplying any goods or services subject to Wyoming sales tax proof that the applicant has a direct payment permit in the form prescribed by the department. The proof of the direct payment permit shall indicate that the applicant assumes all obligations to pay any sales tax due under this article directly to the department of revenue.

Receiving proof of the direct payment permit under subsection (b) of this section shall discharge the vendor furnishing or supplying goods or services to the applicant from any duty to collect or liability for sales taxes owed by the applicant. Any person holding a direct payment permit may be audited by the department of audit once in each calendar year.

The department of revenue shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 61, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 61, § 1, enacted this section as § 39-6-419. The section is set out above as renumbered by the Wyoming Legislative Service Office, pursuant to W.S.

8-1-105

.

Laws 1998, ch. 61, § 3, provides: “The department shall commence rulemaking immediately upon passage of this act into law.”

§ 39-15-107.2.
Voluntary disclosure.

The department of revenue may enter into a voluntary disclosure agreement with any person establishing sufficient contact with this state to qualify the person as a vendor under this article. Application for voluntary disclosure shall be made in a manner and form as prescribed by the department of revenue and shall include a report of transactions taxable under this article. The report shall include a period of not more than the three (3) previous years immediately preceding the agreement. Agreements which include foreclosure to audit shall be cosigned by the director of the department of audit or his designee. The department of revenue shall not enter into a voluntary disclosure agreement with any person currently engaged in an audit or similar investigation by the department of audit or the department of revenue. For good cause, the department of revenue may waive penalties and interest applicable to any tax liability under this article disclosed in a voluntary disclosure agreement.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 58, § 1.

§ 39-15-107.3.
Voluntary licensing and monetary allowances offered under the streamlined sales tax agreement.

Any vendor who licenses to collect and remit applicable sales or use tax on sales made to purchasers in this state in accordance with terms of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement shall not be subject to audit prior to the date of licensure provided the vendor was not licensed in this state and licensing occurs within twelve (12) months of the effective date of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement. The vendor shall not be assessed for uncollected sales or use tax together with penalty or interest for sales made during the period the vendor was not licensed in this state, provided licensing occurs within twelve (12) months of the effective date of this provision. This provision shall not apply to any vendor who has received notice of the commencement of an audit and the audit is not finally resolved including any administrative and judicial processes. The voluntary licensure provision shall not be available for sales or use taxes already paid or remitted to the state or for taxes collected by the vendor. The provisions of this section shall be fully effective absent fraud or intentional misrepresentation of a material fact so long as the vendor continues to license and continues collection and remittance of applicable sales or use taxes for a period of not less than thirty-six (36) months following his initial licensure as a vendor. The voluntary licensure provision shall only apply to sales or use taxes due from a vendor acting as a seller and not as a purchaser.

A certified service provider and user of any technology model approved by the department who collects the Wyoming sales and use taxes shall be granted a monetary allowance for collecting the taxes as provided in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement. Any allowance shall be funded entirely from taxes collected under the technology models and shall be based on the contracted amount between the governing board and the service providers.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 5, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 5, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2005.